Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.430

License denial, suspension, or revocation—Penalties.

(1) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke a license issued by the department upon determining that an applicant or licensee has:

(a) Refused, neglected, or failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under it, or a lawful order of the department;

(b) Refused, neglected, or failed to keep and maintain required records or to make such records available when requested; and

(c) Refused the department access to a portion or area of the food facility for the purpose of carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

(2) In addition to or instead of suspending or revoking a license, the department may impose and collect a civil monetary penalty as provided in RCW 15.130.550 for a licensee's violations of this chapter or the rules adopted under it.

[ 2018 c 236 s 404.]